Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.050

Bonds of state of Washington and its agencies.

A mutual savings bank may invest its funds in the bonds or interest bearing obligations of this state, or any agency thereof, issued pursuant to the authority of any law of this state, whether such bonds or interest bearing obligations are general or limited obligations of the state or such agency.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.20.050. Prior: 1953 c 238 s 4; 1929 c 74 s 9; 1921 c 156 s 11b; RRS s 3381-4.]